District of Columbia statutes.
25-208

Office of the General Counsel.

There shall be established within ABRA an Office of the General Counsel. The head of the office shall be the General Counsel, who shall be an attorney admitted to the practice of law in the District and who shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the Mayor. The General Counsel shall advise the Board regarding all legal matters. The Office of the General Counsel shall also be available to provide mediation services or a professional mediator, as a delegate, if the parties to a settlement conference require or request assistance.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 321, ch. 4, § 4
Apr. 20, 1948, 62 Stat. 176, ch. 217, § 2
Oct. 28, 1949, 63 Stat. 972, ch. 782, title XI, § 1106(a)
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(h), 25 DCR 5740
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, § 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(1), 30 DCR 5927
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-119, § 2, 31 DCR 4040
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 25(a), 32 DCR 30
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(b), 41 DCR 1658
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-206.
1973 Ed., § 25-104.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 13-298, the Title 25, D.C. Code Enactment and Related Amendments Act of 2001, see Mayor’s Order 2001-96, June 28, 2001 ( 48 DCR 6277).
Partial Rescission of Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 13-298, the Title 25, DC Code Enactment and Related Amendments Act of 2001, see Mayor’s Order 2001-102, July 23, 2001 ( 48 DCR 7792).